California statutes. Education Code
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the liability of the acquiring district for the repayment of any portion of the apportionment made to the state-aided district shall not exceed the product of the highest percentage referred to above (whether relating to assessed valuation or to the portion of the apportionment expended in the property acquired), multiplied by the balance due on the apportionment made to the state-aided district at the time of the withdrawal on the effective date specified in Section 4064 (Sec. 1, Ch. 95, Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess.) of the territory referred to. The limited liability is hereinafter referred to as “the maximum.” It is the intent of the Legislature that the maximum shall be applied by the Controller, both retroactively and prospectively, provided that as a result of the application (1) no cash refund shall be made to any district; (2) in the event any district has, in the past, paid an amount greater than the maximum, assuming this paragraph had been in effect at that time, the excess shall be credited by the Controller against any apportionment balances for which the district is or may hereafter become liable; and (3) the Controller shall make retroactively any adjustments in the amounts due from other districts by virtue of any adjustments made under (2) above. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any computations required to be made pursuant to this paragraph shall not be reflected in any changes in deductions required to be made pursuant to Section 16080 prior to January 1, 1966.

If any subdivision clause, sentence, or phrase of this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional the decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this section. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have adopted this section and each subdivision, sentence, clause, or phrase thereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more subsections, clauses, sentences, or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16160.

Notwithstanding Sections 16159 and 16161, in situations where an applicant district at the elementary grade level under this chapter is divided into three parts, each of which is included in a newly formed unified school district, each part shall be excluded in determining the state loan repayment liability for any apportionment made to the original district subsequent to the date the unification is effective for purposes of Section 35532, provided that all of the following occur:

(a) The assessed valuation of the part is less than 4 percent of the original district in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year the change is made effective for all purposes.

(b) The average daily attendance in the part is excluded in determining projected enrollment of the original district for additional state aid during the period after the change is effective for purposes of Section 35532 and before the effective date for all purposes.

(c) The part contains no sites, plans, or school facilities, which were acquired under this chapter or under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 7.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16161.

Notwithstanding any change in the boundaries of a state-aided district or the annexation to, or the inclusion in, another district of a state-aided district, the state-aided district as it existed immediately prior to the effective date of the action shall be continued in existence for the determination of the assessed valuation of the property therein and for the purposes of the computations provided by Sections 16070, 16072, 16074, 16075 and 16084; and all the computations required to be made pursuant to those sections shall be made exactly as if there had been no such change of boundaries, annexation, or inclusion, except as otherwise provided in Sections 16163 and 16164. However, that if a state-aided district shall be included entirely in another school district which subsequently becomes state aided, then the unpaid balances of the apportionments made to the original district shall be added to the balances of the apportionments made to the newly aided district. In those cases, no further computations as aforesaid, or repayments, shall be made with respect to the original district, but the computations and repayments shall thenceforth be based solely upon the territory and assessed valuation of the newly aided district, in the manner provided by Sections 16070, 16072, 16074, 16075 and 16084.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16162.

If a unified school district, after the effective date of this section, applies for and is granted an apportionment under this chapter on the basis of grade levels as defined in Section 16003, all unpaid balances of prior apportionments made to the district, subject to Section 16161, shall be added to the balances of the apportionments made on the basis of Section 16003. In those cases, no further computations or repayments under Sections 16070, 16072, 16074, 16075 and 16084 shall be made with respect to the prior apportionments alone, but the computations and repayments shall thenceforth be based solely upon the combined apportionments, and shall be made as provided in Sections 16071, 16072, 16074, 16075 and 16084.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16163.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment becomes final, territory is withdrawn from a state-aided district and no portion of the apportionment was expended for school property acquired by the acquiring district:

(1) If the acquiring district is a state-aided district, the assessed valuation in the territory acquired shall be included in determining assessed valuation of the property in the acquiring district, and shall thereafter be excluded in determining assessed valuation of the property in the state-aided district, for purposes of the computations under Sections 16070 to 16075, inclusive;

(2) If the acquiring district is not a state-aided district, the Controller shall determine the percentage relationship, at the time of the withdrawal, between (a) the assessed valuation in the territory acquired, together with the current assessed valuation in all other territory theretofore acquired by the acquiring district from the state-aided district since the date of its first conditional apportionment under this chapter, and (b) the current assessed valuation of the state-aided district as it was territorially constituted on the latter date.

If the percentage of assessed valuation in acquired territory is, in the aggregate, less than 10 percent, the assessed valuation in all the acquired territory shall be excluded, until the next withdrawal of territory from the state-aided district to the acquiring district, in determining the assessed valuation of the state-aided district for the purposes of the computations under Sections 16070 to 16075, inclusive.

If the percentage of assessed valuation in acquired territory is, in the aggregate, a percentage equal to or greater than 10 percent, the Controller shall, by deducting the percentage from 100 percent, obtain the “complement percentage.” Until the next withdrawal of territory from the state-aided district to the acquiring district, the assessed valuation of the state-aided district for purposes of the computations under Sections 16070 to 16075, inclusive, shall be determined by dividing the current assessed valuation of the state-aided district as territorially constituted immediately subsequent to the last withdrawal, by the complement percentage.

Whenever, pursuant to this section, the assessed valuation of the state-aided district is adjusted for repayment computation purposes by use of the complement percentage, liability for the annual repayment computed shall be apportioned between the state-aided district and the acquiring district by multiplying the annual repayment by the complement percentage, the product representing the liability of the state-aided district, and the remainder of the computed repayment representing the liability of the acquiring district.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the liability of the state-aided district shall not exceed the product of any “complement percentage” (as it may from time to time exist) times the balance due on the aforesaid final apportionment at the time the complement percentage is established; and the liability of the acquiring district (while a complement percentage remains unchanged) shall not exceed the remainder of the balance of the final apportionment at the time complement percentage is established. The maximum liability on the part of either the state-aided or acquiring districts established as above (and until the time that the liability be altered by altering the “complement percentage”) shall be hereinafter referred to in this section with respect to each such district as “the maximum.”

(3) In the event that two or more non-state-aided districts acquire territory from the state-aided district, the Controller shall determine the formulae for apportioning liability for the annual repayment between the districts affected (including the formulae for determining what assessed valuations shall be used within the affected districts or territories withdrawn, and the dates of determination thereof), as will in his or her opinion best comply with the principles set forth above, irrespective of whether the formulae are in literal compliance therewith. The same percentage of annual repayment for which a district is liable at the time the liability apportionment is made shall (unless and until the liability apportionment is subsequently changed pursuant to this paragraph) be deemed applicable to the liability of the district for the balance (as of the date the liability apportionment is made) due on the final apportionment to the state-aided district. The liability for the balance shall, with respect to any affected district, be hereinafter referred to as the “maximum” for the district.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the foregoing “maximums” shall be applied by the Controller both retroactively and prospectively, provided that as a result of the application (1) no cash refund shall be made to any district; (2) in the event any district has, in the past, paid an amount greater than its “maximum,” assuming this paragraph and others to which it is referable had been in effect at that time, the excess shall be credited by the Controller against any apportionment balances for which the district is or may hereafter become liable; and (3) the Controller shall make retroactively any adjustments in the amounts due from any other district by virtue of any adjustments made under (2) above. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any computations required to be made pursuant to this paragraph shall not be reflected in any changes in deductions required to be made pursuant to Section 16080 prior to January 1, 1966.

If any subdivision, clause, sentence, or phrase of this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional the decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this section. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have adopted this section and each subdivision, sentence, clause, or phrase thereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more subdivisions, clauses, sentences, or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16164.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment becomes final, any territory is withdrawn from a non-state-aided district and annexed to the state-aided district, the assessed valuation in the territory so annexed shall be included with the valuation of the state-aided district for the purposes of making the computations provided by Sections 16070 to 16075, inclusive.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16165.

The Controller shall compute, in accordance with Sections 16161, 16163 and 16164, the amount of the annual repayment due the state on account of the apportionment or apportionments to each state-aided district and shall deduct from the respective apportionments made from the State School Fund under Sections 46304, 46305, and 92 or 41050, Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive, to the state-aided district and an acquiring district the portion thereof for which each is liable under this article (Sections 16150 to 16166, inclusive).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16166.

When, after any application is filed, the applicant district is annexed to, or, by change of boundaries or otherwise, is included in whole or in part in another district or districts, the superintendent of schools of the county having jurisdiction over the applicant district shall, within 10 days after the effective date of the annexation, inclusion, or change of boundaries, file a certificate with the board, in writing, in the form that the board shall prescribe, setting forth (1) the effective date of the annexation, inclusion, or change of boundaries; (2) identification of the area of the school district affected by the change and the name of the school district or districts in which the area is included as a result thereof; and (3) any additional information in any form that the board may require.

The board shall, upon receiving the appropriate certificate from a county superintendent of schools as provided herein, promptly notify the State Controller, in writing, of (1) the effective date of annexation or other inclusion of a state-aided district by an acquiring district; (2) the name of the state-aided district; (3) the name of the acquiring district; and (4) the number and other identification of the apportionment affected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. School Housing Aid for Exceptional Children [16190. - 16207.]

16190.

The board may make apportionments from any sum appropriated by the Legislature at the 1952 Second Extraordinary Session and from any state bonds heretofore or hereafter authorized by the electorate for state school building aid, including the proceeds of bonds authorized by Section 2 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for assistance to school districts in providing necessary housing and equipment for the education of exceptional children. All the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 16150) of this chapter, except Sections 16007 and 16044, shall apply to this article unless otherwise provided herein.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16191.

As used in this article, “exceptional children” means physically handicapped pupils, pupils with intellectual disabilities, educationally handicapped pupils, multihandicapped pupils, or pupils enrolled in development centers for the handicapped required or allowed to be educated pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 6.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16192.

Allocations under this article for assistance to school districts in providing necessary housing and equipment for the education of pupils enrolled or to be enrolled in development centers for the handicapped may be made only to those school districts that are authorized to operate development centers pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 56800) of Chapter 6 of Part 30, as enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 1010 of the Statutes of 1976.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16193.

The State Allocation Board, in cooperation with the State Department of Education, shall develop standards to be complied with in the construction of housing facilities for development centers for the handicapped with allowances provided pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16194.

The State Allocation Board shall establish guidelines and procedures to be utilized in determining the eligibility of school districts for allowances provided pursuant to this article with respect to facilities and equipment for the education of pupils enrolled in development centers for the handicapped. The guidelines and procedures shall provide that in order to be eligible to receive the allowance the school district has no existing facilities which could be utilized for a development center for the handicapped.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16195.

Allocations under this article may be made in the amount as may be necessary, and in the manner as to distribute the available funds equitably among school districts, giving consideration to the needs of each district and the number of children within each district who are blind, partially seeing, aphasic, deaf, hard of hearing, orthopedically impaired, or have an intellectual disability, or who are health impaired, multihandicapped, speech handicapped, educationally handicapped, or enrolled in development centers for the handicapped.

In computing the number of those children, there shall be included all of the following:

(a) The number of them residing in the
 district.

(b) The number of handicapped minors who are actually living within the district five or more days a week, although their legal residence may be outside the district, and who are educated pursuant to former Section 56708, as enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 1010 of the Statutes of 1976.

(c) The number of them who reside outside of the district, except those described in subdivision (b), and who are to be educated by the district, excluding minors with intellectual disabilities within former Section 56501, as amended by Section 58 of Chapter 1247 of the Statutes of 1977, who reside within a district having an average daily attendance of 900 or more and that does not meet the requirements of Section 16058 concerning outstanding bonded indebtedness.

Allocations for housing and equipment for minors having speech defects or disorders
 shall be allowed in new schools constructed after July 1, 1968, and in existing schools constructed between July 1, 1933, and July 1, 1968. The housing and equipment shall be designed and provided to permit their utilization for remedial and other special services including speech therapy, speech reading (lipreading), and auditory training for the speech and hearing handicapped, screening and testing for speech and hearing defects, or both, psychological testing of exceptional children, subject matter tutoring of exceptional children, and other specialized activities required by these children. In addition to the maximum building area allowances provided in Sections 16047, 16052, 16053, and 16054, not more than an additional 200 square feet of building area shall be allowed for each new school so planned and constructed.

Each existing school, constructed between July 1, 1933, and July 1, 1968, shall be allowed not more than an additional 200 square feet of building
 area only for construction thereon of a new speech facility. At the option of the applicant district, the board may allocate funds to convert existing facilities or to provide a combination of new construction and conversion of existing facilities to provide housing for minors having speech defects or disorders, provided the cost of the conversion or combination of new construction and conversion does not exceed the computed cost for 200 square feet of new classroom construction based upon cost standards adopted by the board. At the further option of the applicant district, and in lieu of new building construction or conversion, the board may allocate funds for the acquisition of mobile speech therapy facilities, provided the cost of the mobile facilities does not exceed the combined computed cost for 200 square feet of new classroom construction, based upon cost standards adopted by the board, at all schools that will be served by the mobile facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 7.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16196.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, apportionments for the construction of facilities and the purchase of essential furniture and equipment for the education of exceptional children may, subject to the approval of the State Department of Education, be made to a school district not otherwise eligible to receive apportionments under Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 16150) of this chapter, for the education of blind, partially seeing, aphasic, deaf, hard-of-hearing, orthopedically impaired or other health-impaired, multihandicapped, and educationally handicapped minors, minors with intellectual disabilities, pupils having speech defects or disorders, or pupils enrolled in development centers for
 the handicapped.

The State Department of Education may approve applications if the facilities will be used by a county superintendent of schools required to educate physically handicapped minors pursuant to former Section 1850, as enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 1010 of the Statutes of 1976, and minors with intellectual disabilities pursuant to former Section 1880, as enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 1010 of the Statutes of 1976. A school district may educate these minors by agreement with a county superintendent of schools required to educate these minors. Priority in the use of the facilities shall be given to pupils from districts other than the applicant district.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, not more than 50 percent of the amount of an apportionment made pursuant to this section shall be repaid. Repayments shall be made in the following manner: 50 percent of the amount of the apportionment shall be
 repaid in full with interest by the district, in the annual amounts and at the interest rate over the period as the State Allocation Board may determine, not to exceed 20 years from the date the apportionment became final. In a school year in which 50 percent or more of the pupils in average daily attendance, as determined by the county superintendent of schools, and served by the facilities are not pupils from districts other than the applicant district, the repayment for the succeeding fiscal year shall be an amount that would have been payable if the district had been required to repay 100 percent of the apportionment over that period.

The county board of supervisors of the county whose superintendent of schools conducts classes in the facility during any fiscal year shall at that time or times within the fiscal year that may be agreed upon between the county and the school district, but in any case not later than the end of the fiscal year, pay to the school
 district having the obligation to repay the apportionment made under this section for the construction of the facility, an amount equal to 80 percent of the amount the district is required to repay in the fiscal year with respect to the apportionment described above.

The county board of supervisors shall raise the amount required through a general tax levy on the property within the participating districts, or through a tuition charge not to exceed one hundred sixty dollars ($160) a year per pupil by the county superintendent of schools to the school districts of residence of pupils attending the facility other than the district having the obligation to repay, or through a combination of these.

The county superintendent of schools shall notify the county board of supervisors of his or her intention to approve a school district’s application for an allocation under this article before he or she approves the
 application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 8.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16197.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article to the contrary, apportionments for the purchase of mobile classrooms for the education of physically handicapped pupils enrolled in integrated programs, as set forth in Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000), and for the education and therapy of speech-handicapped pupils may, subject to the approval of the department, be made to any school district not otherwise eligible to receive apportionments under
 Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 16150) for that purpose.

(b) The State Department of Education may approve applications in those situations where mobile classrooms will be used by a county superintendent of schools required to educate physically handicapped minors pursuant to
 Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) of Part 30. Mobile classrooms shall be used pursuant to an agreement authorized by Section 41308.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, not more than 50 percent of the amount of any apportionment made pursuant to this section shall be repaid. Repayments shall be made in the following manner: Fifty percent of the amount of the apportionment shall be repaid in full with interest by the district, in annual amounts and at an interest rate over the period as the State Allocation Board may determine, not to exceed 20 years from the date the apportionment became final. In any school year in which 50
 percent or more of the pupils in average daily attendance, as determined by the county superintendent of schools, and served by the facilities are not pupils from districts other than the applicant district, the repayment for the succeeding fiscal year shall be an amount which would have been payable if the district had been required to repay 100 percent of the apportionment over that period.

(d) The county board of supervisors of the county whose superintendent of schools uses mobile classrooms during any fiscal year shall at the time or times within the fiscal year as may be agreed upon between the county and the school district, but in any case not later than the end
 of the fiscal year, pay to the school district having the obligation to repay the apportionment made under this section for the purchase of mobile classrooms, an amount equal to 100 percent of the amount the district is required to repay in the fiscal year with respect to the apportionment described above.

(e) The county board of supervisors shall raise the amount required through a general tax levy on the property within the participating districts, or through a tuition charge not to exceed one hundred sixty dollars ($160) a year per pupil by the county superintendent of schools to the school districts of residence of pupils attending the facility including the district
 having the obligation to repay, or through a combination of these.

(f) The county superintendent of schools shall notify the county board of supervisors of his or her intention to approve a school district’s application for an allocation under this article before he or she approves the application.

(g) The department shall prepare specifications or regulations for the construction of mobile classrooms to provide for a useful life of no less than 20 years.

(h) The use of mobile classrooms shall meet specifications described by the department as they relate to the needs of the physically handicapped pupils being served, as set forth in Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) of Part
 30.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   (SB 509)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16198.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the board shall control the amount of apportionments made for facilities for exceptional children. In so controlling these apportionments the board shall establish allowable building areas and cost standards comparable to the building areas and costs of similar facilities constructed by school districts which are not applicants under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16199.

The State Department of Education may accept applications by school districts for the construction of facilities and the purchase of essential furniture and equipment, under a pilot project to maintain regional programs for physically exceptional children.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish standards with respect to the regional programs for the pilot project which shall include, among other things, the curriculum to be offered, the area to be served, and the supervision and instruction with respect to the programs. Of the school district applicants which meet the standards established, the State Department of Education may designate not more than four school districts to receive apportionments as part of the pilot project to maintain regional programs for physically exceptional children.

The pilot project pursuant to this act shall begin with the 1972–1973 school year and shall terminate at the end of the 1974–1975 school year. The State Department of Education shall provide for state evaluation of the pilot project.

With respect to school districts selected as part of the pilot project, the State Allocation Board may approve applications and make apportionments pursuant to Section 16196, notwithstanding that the school district is serving a district or districts with an average daily attendance in excess of 8,000.

In any school year in which 50 percent or more of the pupils in average daily attendance, as determined by the county superintendent of schools, and served by the facilities are not pupils from districts other than the applicant district, the repayment for the succeeding fiscal year shall be an amount which would have been payable if the district had been required to repay 100 percent of the apportionment over that period.

The districts participating in a pilot project may include in interdistrict attendance agreements the cost of making repayments in the same proportion to the total repayment as the number of pupils enrolled from each district bears to the total number of pupils enrolled.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16200.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, the board may make apportionments to school districts not otherwise eligible to receive apportionments under Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 16150) for the construction of special education facilities and the purchase of essential furniture and equipment for the purpose of either or both of the following: (1) educating those physically handicapped and educationally handicapped pupils and pupils with intellectual disabilities who regularly reside in an established, licensed children’s institution or family home and are being educated pursuant to former Section 42902, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 1173 of the Statutes of 1977, and (2) educating handicapped
 pupils in development centers for handicapped pupils pursuant to former Article 1 (commencing with Section 56800) of Chapter 6 of Part 30, as enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 1010 of the Statutes of 1976.

Only 50 percent of any amounts allocated and disbursed to a district under this section shall be repaid by the district. Each disbursement shall be repaid in 20 equal annual installments, including interest as determined by the board, and shall be computed and withheld by the Controller. The first computation of repayment of any disbursement shall be made in the fiscal year following the disbursement and shall during the next fiscal year be deducted in equal amounts from the February, March, April, and May installments of the apportionment made to the district from the State School Fund under Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 9.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16201.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 16150) of this chapter, the obligation of any district receiving an apportionment under this article to repay the apportionment shall not extend to more than one-half of the amount of the apportionment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16202.

With the approval of the county superintendent of schools, a school district may make application for an allocation under this article. Facilities for which an apportionment is made under this section shall be made available for use by the county superintendent of schools until he or she ceases to conduct the classes therein or until the superintendent of schools of a county other than the county whose superintendent of schools approved the application made under this section acquires jurisdiction over the location of the facility, whichever first occurs. Not more than 50 percent of the amount of any apportionment made pursuant to this section shall be repaid. Repayments shall be made in the following manner: Ten percent of the amount of the apportionment shall be subject to repayment by the district to the extent, and in the manner prescribed in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter for apportionments other than those made pursuant to Section 16039. Forty percent of the amount of the apportionment shall be repaid in full with interest by the district, in the annual amounts and over the period as the board may determine, not to exceed 20 years from the date the apportionment became final. The county board of supervisors of the county whose superintendent of schools conducts classes in the facility during any fiscal year shall at the time or times within the fiscal year as may be agreed upon between the county and the school district, but in any case not later than the end of the fiscal year, pay to the school district having the obligation to repay the apportionment made under this section for the construction of the facility, an amount equal to the amount the district is required to repay in that fiscal year with respect to the 40 percent of the amount of the apportionment described above.

The county board of supervisors may raise the amount required through a general tax levy or through a tuition charge not to exceed one hundred sixty dollars ($160) a year per pupil by the county superintendent of schools to the school districts of residence of pupils attending the facility other than the district having the obligation to repay or through a combination of these.

Upon application of a school district and written approval of the county superintendent of schools the board may amend any apportionment previously received by a district for exceptional children by providing that the same shall be deemed to have been made with reference to this section, in which event all the incidents of this section shall be deemed applicable thereto, except that only the unpaid balance of the apportionment at the time of the amendment of the apportionment with interest accrued to that date shall be repaid as prescribed in this section.

The county superintendent of schools shall notify the county board of supervisors of his or her intention to approve a school district’s application for an allocation under this article before he approves the application.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16203.

Not later than July 10th of each year the county superintendent of schools of each county in which there is a school district maintaining facilities for the education of exceptional children which have been constructed with funds apportioned to the district under this article shall certify to the board of supervisors and to the county auditor of the county the total number of units of average daily attendance of pupils enrolled in the facilities during the next preceding fiscal year who reside in a district other than the district maintaining the facilities. On or before July 10th of each year the county superintendent of schools shall notify the governing board of each affected school district of the total number of units of average daily attendance of pupils residing in that district who were in attendance at the facilities maintained by another district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16204.

On or before July 20th of each year, the governing board of a school district which has received a notification pursuant to Section 16203, shall determine, and notify the county board of supervisors and the county auditor, whether the amounts required to be paid on behalf of the district under Section 16207 shall be provided from the general fund of the district or by a special district tax levied by the county board of supervisors.

In the event that the district notification specifies that the amounts so required shall be provided by a special district tax, or if no notification is made, the board of supervisors with whom the certificate prescribed by Section 16203 is filed shall, at the time of making the tax levy for that year for county purposes, levy a special tax upon all taxable property in the district of residence of each pupil enrolled in the facilities other than the district maintaining the facilities, sufficient in amount to raise, for the use of the facilities, the sum of one hundred sixty dollars ($160) per unit of average daily attendance, less any amounts per unit of the average daily attendance remaining in the county school building aid fund from levies and collections made in any prior year and not paid to the state pursuant to Section 16207.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16205.

If the board of supervisors fails to make a district tax levy required under Section 16204, the auditor shall make the levy.
